Tennessee, session 114, SB0457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-115(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting "twenty-hundredths of one percent (0.20%)" and substituting "fifteen-hundredths of one
percent (0.15%)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-218(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "twenty-hundredths of one percent (0.20%)" and substituting "fifteen-hundredths of one
percent (0.15%)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0457
000404
- 1 -